Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 12

Arkansas Foresters Hall of Fame

13-12-101. Creation.

There is created the Arkansas Foresters Hall of Fame to be housed in the Department of Forest Resources at the University of Arkansas at Monticello.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 111, § 1.

13-12-102. Selection.

Persons to be inducted into the Arkansas Foresters Hall of Fame shall be selected by the Arkansas Division of the Society of American Foresters.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 111, § 1.

13-12-103. Rules.

The Dean of the Department of Forest Resources at the University of Arkansas at Monticello shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 111, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 983.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading and in the text.